California, session 20252026, AB1711.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3204 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:3204. (a) Any unallocated balance from Section 3202, 3203, or 3205, revenue deposited into the Fair and Exposition Fund pursuant to Section 19614 of the Business and Professions Code, and funding appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise designated for California fairs pursuant to this chapter or any other law is hereby appropriated without regard to fiscal years for allocation by the secretary for capital outlay to California fairs for fair projects involving public health, fire and life safety, and emergency services improvement projects at fairs, California Code of Regulations compliance projects, and maintenance projects at fairgrounds, for projects that are required by physical changes to the fair site, for projects that are required to protect the fair property or installation, such as fencing and flood protection, and for the acquisition or improvement of any property or facility that will serve to enhance the operation of the fair.(b) A portion of the funds moneys subject to allocation pursuant to subdivision (a) may be allocated to California fairs for general operational support. It is the intent of the Legislature that these moneys be used primarily for those fairs whose sources of revenue may be limited for purposes specified in this section.(c) No Not more than 5 percent of the moneys in the Fair and Exposition Fund may be used during any fiscal year to augment the budget of the department to develop and administer an operational and policy framework for the network of California fairs. retained in the fund from year to year as a prudent reserve for contingencies. The remainder of the fund shall be allocated annually as specified in subdivision (d).(d) All available funds moneys in the Fair and Exposition Fund shall be allocated to the network of California fairs pursuant to an approved expenditure plan no later than December 31 of each calendar year.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________